Tennessee, session 114, HB2561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-204-108, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) The annual comprehensive reports described in subsection (a) may be
submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2561
012511
- 1 -